Massachusetts, session 194th, S2528.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding Section 1 of Chapter 37 of the Acts of 2004 the Select
Board may establish fines related to parking violations during a snow emergency at no more than
$100 if paid within 21 days; no more than $105, if paid thereafter.
SECTION 2. this Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1